Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6784XS (2) 91 ss/ns S.F. 2130 Section 1. Section 483A.12, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. A license agent shall display and make 3 available to the public voter registration forms, as defined in 4 section 48A.2, at each location where the license agent sells 5 licenses. The license agent shall offer a voter registration 6 form to each person purchasing a license, but shall not assist 7 the person in completing the voter registration form or collect 8 a complete or incomplete voter registration form. A license 9 agent is not a voter registration agency as defined in section 10 48A.2. 11